Washington statutes.
RCW 43.334.077

Skeletal human remains assistance account.

The skeletal human remains assistance account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All appropriations provided by the legislature for this purpose as well as any reimbursement for services provided pursuant to chapter 275, Laws of 2008 must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for archaeological determinations and excavations of inadvertently discovered skeletal human remains, and removal and reinterment of such remains when necessary. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2008 c 275 s 7.]

NOTES:

Reporting requirements—2008 c 275: See note following RCW 68.50.645.